Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3414
Hearing before Legislature's Committee on Agriculture; when; purpose.

The director shall request a hearing by the Legislature's Committee on Agriculture when petitioned by either fifteen percent of the egg or turkey producers or any number of producers representing thirty percent of the eggs or turkeys upon which fees are being collected to determine whether or not there is need to amend or repeal sections 2-3401 to 2-3416.

Laws 1976, LB 514, § 14.
December 31, 2027